Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Article 2. Management of Other Assets.

Sec. 37.13.300.
Corporation to manage certain assets of the mental health trust.

The corporation shall manage the mental health trust fund.

The corporation shall

hold and invest the mental health trust fund subject to AS

37.13.120

;

at least quarterly, prepare, publish, and distribute to the Board of Trustees of the Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority a financial report showing investment revenue and expenditures, including the allocation of the cash assets of the mental health trust fund among investments;

annually prepare, publish, and distribute to the Board of Trustees of the Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority financial statements prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles consistently applied, and an audit report prepared by a certified public accountant;

periodically advise the Board of Trustees of the Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority when revisions to long-range investment policy, including asset allocation changes, are contemplated, and provide an opportunity for consultation and comment on the changes before they are implemented; and

transfer to the mental health trust settlement income account the net income available for distribution attributable to the mental health trust fund at the end of each fiscal year.

Net income from the mental health trust fund may not be included in the computation of net income or market value available for distribution or appropriation under AS

37.13.140

.

History.

(§ 9 ch 66 SLA 1991; am § 3 ch 5 FSSLA 1994; am § 7 ch 16 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective August 1, 2018, in (c), substituted “net income or market value available for distribution or appropriation under AS

37.13.140

” for “net income available for distribution under AS

37.13.140

” at the end.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 16, SLA 2018 (SB 26), which amended subsection (c), see 2017 Senate Journal 38 — 39.

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1996, in paragraph (b)(5) of this section, “mental health trust settlement income account” was substituted for “mental health trust income account” pursuant to sec. 17, ch. 1, SSSLA 1994.